Texas, session 892, HB131.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  Subtitle E, Title 2, Chapter 101A, Health and Safety Code, as effective December 1, 2025, is repealed. SECTION 2.  The comptroller shall transfer any money appropriated to the Dementia Prevention and Research Institute of Texas to the Texas Education Agency to reduce the state compression percentage under Section 48.255, Education Code, to the lowest possible percentage. SECTION 3.   This Act takes effect December 1, 2025, but only if the constitutional amendment proposed by the 89th Legislature, First Called Special Session, 2025, providing for the repeal of the Dementia Prevention and Research Institute of Texas and the Dementia Prevention and Research Fund to provide money for research on and prevention and treatment of dementia, Alzheimer's disease, Parkinson's disease, and related disorders in this state, and transferring from that fund $3 billion to Texas Education Agency for property tax relief is approved by the voters. If that amendment is not approved by the voters, this Act has no effect.